Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2438.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 16-111-1, 16-111-2, 16-111-4, 16-111-5 and 16-111-7 of the
General Laws in Chapter 16-111 entitled "School Waste Recycling and Refuse Disposal" are
hereby amended to read as follows:
16-111-1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter.
(1) “Educational entity” or “educational entities” means all Rhode Island school districts,
including a single school district, regional school district, multiple school districts, any public or
private school grades kindergarten through twelve (K-12), any charter public school, or any career
and technical high school.
(2) "Sharing table" means a department of health-approved designated location in a school
cafeteria where students or staff can place:
(i) Unopened, prepackaged, shelf stable items including, but not limited to, granola bars,
cereal packs, crackers, and drinks;
(ii) Wrapped fruit and vegetables and fruits with a thick skin including, but not limited to,
bananas, oranges, and washed apples; provided that, the peel is intact; and
(iii) Unopened, prepackaged perishable food items; provided that, a temperature control
mechanism is in place to maintain a safe temperature for the food items.
(2)(3) “Waste audit” means an analysis of a facility’s waste stream. The audit can identify
what types of recyclable materials and waste a facility generates; how much of each category is

recovered for recycling or discarded; and what materials can be composted.
16-111-2. Waste audit/report.
(a) On or after January 1, 2022, and every three (3) years thereafter, every educational
entity shall coordinate and cooperate with the Rhode Island resource recovery corporation (RIRRC)
for the purpose of conducting school waste audits. These audits shall produce waste management
reports that shall be collected, maintained, and delivered to the educational entity. The waste audits
shall be performed at every educational entity.
(b) Waste audits and any reports required herein shall include guidelines and strategies on
reducing waste for each educational entity to incorporate into its food waste reduction and
recycling programs in an effort to eliminate food waste, promote recycling, and provide food to
local communities.
(c) Educational entities, using the guidelines and strategies pursuant to subsection (b), shall
design and implement a waste collection system in accordance with applicable state law for the
diversion of items including, but not limited to, paper, books, furniture, computers, office supplies,
plastic, glass, cardboard, and surplus foods.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any waste audit conducted pursuant to this
section shall be provided free of charge by the RIRRC.
(e) Effective January 1, 2027, and every three (3) years thereafter, educational entities shall
report the results of any waste audit conducted pursuant to this section to the commissioner of the
Rhode Island department of education who shall publish the results of the audit on the department
website.
16-111-4. Food service — Local sources preferred.
It shall be the policy of the state, the department of education, and any educational entity
to encourage require that any request for proposal (RFP) or invitation for bid (IFB) to a food service
company (vendor) to provide food services to an educational entity encourage the use of a vendor
that purchases ten percent (10%) of the required food service product from a Rhode Island-based
food service company. In addition, it shall also be the policy of the state, the department of
education, and any educational entity, to encourage the only use of vendors who recycle organic-
waste materials at an authorized composting facility, an anaerobic digestion facility, or by another
authorized recycling method, regardless of whether the entity purchasing the services is or is not
an educational entity, or a covered entity or a covered educational institution pursuant to the
provisions of § 23-18.9-7.
16-111-5. Food donations by food service companies.
(a) It shall be the policy of the state, the department of education, and any educational entity
LC004754/SUB A - Page 2 of 7

to require that any request for proposal (RFP) to select a food service company (vendor) to provide
food services to an educational entity shall require the vendor to donate any unserved nonperishable
or unspoiled perishable food to local food banks or the Rhode Island Food Bank in accordance with
the recommendations from the Rhode Island department of health “The Road to End Hunger”
initiative.
(b) Vendors required to donate nonperishable and unspoiled perishable food to local food
banks or the Rhode Island Food Bank shall initially make arrangements for the provision
accommodations necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
(c) Except for injury resulting from gross negligence or intentional misconduct in the
preparation or handling of donated food, no educational entity, person, or vendor who or that
donates food that is fit for human consumption at the time it was donated, as required by subsection
(a), shall be liable for any damage or injury resulting from the consumption of the donated food.
(d) The immunity from civil liability provided by this section applies regardless of
compliance with any laws, regulations, or ordinances regulating the packaging or labeling of food,
and regardless of compliance with any laws, regulations, or ordinances regulating the storage or
handling of the food by the donee after the donation of the food. The donation of nonperishable
food that is fit for human consumption but that has exceeded the labeled shelf life date
recommended by the manufacturer is protected pursuant to this section. The donation of perishable
food that is fit for human consumption but that has exceeded the labeled shelf life date
recommended by the manufacturer is protected pursuant to this section if the person who
distributes the food to the end recipient makes a good faith evaluation that the food to be donated
is wholesome.
(e) The local food bank or Rhode Island Food Bank that, in good faith, receives and
distributes food without charge, pursuant to subsection (a), that is fit for human consumption at the
time it was distributed is not liable for any injury or death due to the food unless the injury or death
is a direct result of the gross negligence or intentional misconduct of the organization.
(f) Vendors pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall provide an annual report to the
Rhode Island department of education on a form prepared by the department, detailing the amount
of unserved nonperishable or unspoiled perishable food donated pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section and shall also provide information relative to any tax deduction or credit utilized by the
vendor due to donations made pursuant to this section. Information required by this subsection shall
be published on the RIDE website.
16-111-7. Rules and regulations.
The commissioner is hereby authorized directed to promulgate whatever rules and
LC004754/SUB A - Page 3 of 7

regulations may be required to implement this chapter and shall annually provide notice to all
educational entities of the department’s school waste disposal and refuse disposal policies. The
rules and regulations required pursuant to this section shall be promulgated no later than January
1, 2027.
SECTION 2. Chapter 16-111 of the General Laws entitled "School Waste Recycling and
Refuse Disposal" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
16-111-8. Share tables.
(a) An educational entity may do both of the following to minimize waste and to reduce
food insecurity:
(1) Provide sharing tables where food service staff, students, and faculty may return
appropriate food items and make those food items available to students during the course of a
regular school meal time.
(2) Allow the food placed on the sharing tables that is not taken by a student during the
course of a regular school meal time in accordance with subsection (a)(1) of this section to be
donated to a food bank or any other nonprofit charitable organization.
(b) Donations of food or food made available to students during the course of a regular
school meal time pursuant to this section may include prepackaged food with the packaging still
intact and in good condition, whole uncut produce that is packaged and/or wrapped or has a thick
skin or produce providing the skin of the produce is intact before donation, unopened bags of sliced
fruit, unopened containers of milk that are immediately stored in a cooling bin maintained at forty-
one degrees Fahrenheit (41°F) or below, and perishable prepackaged food if it is placed in a proper
temperature-controlled environment.
(c) When an educational entity makes food available to students during the course of a
regular school meal time or donates food to a food bank or any other nonprofit charitable
organization for distribution, the preparation, safety, and donation of food shall be consistent with
relevant provisions of the Rhode Island food code (216-RICR-50-10-1) and approved by the
department of health.
SECTION 3. Section 23-18.9-17 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-18.9 entitled "Refuse
Disposal" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-18.9-17. Food waste ban.
(a) On and after January 1, 2016, each covered entity and each covered educational
institution shall ensure that the organic-waste materials that are generated by the covered entity or
at the covered educational facility are recycled at an authorized composting facility or anaerobic
digestion facility or by another authorized recycling method if:
LC004754/SUB A - Page 4 of 7

(1) The covered entity or covered educational facility generates not less than one hundred
four (104) tons per year of organic-waste material; and
(2) The covered entity or covered educational facility is located not more than fifteen (15)
miles from an authorized composting facility or anaerobic digestion facility with available capacity
to accept such material.
(b) On and after January 1, 2018, each covered educational institution shall ensure that the
organic-waste materials that are generated at the covered educational facility are recycled at an
authorized composting facility or anaerobic digestion facility or by another authorized recycling
method if:
(1) The covered educational facility generates not less than fifty-two (52) tons per year of
organic-waste material; and
(2) The covered entity or covered educational facility is located not more than fifteen (15)
miles from an authorized composting facility or anaerobic digestion facility with available capacity
to accept such material.
(c) The director shall grant a waiver of the requirements of subsections (a) and (b) upon a
showing that the tipping fee charged by the Rhode Island resource recovery corporation for non-
contract commercial sector waste is less than the fee charged for organic-waste material by each
composting facility or anaerobic digestion facility located within fifteen (15) miles of the covered
entity’s location.
(d) On and after January 1, 2023, until January 1, 2029, each educational entity (as defined
in § 16-110-1 16-111-1) shall ensure that the organic-waste materials that are generated by the
educational entity are recycled at an authorized composting facility or anaerobic digestion facility
or by another authorized recycling method if:
(1) The educational entity generates not less than thirty (30) tons per year of organic-waste
material; and
(2) The educational entity is located not more than fifteen (15) miles from an authorized
composting facility or anaerobic digestion facility with available capacity to accept such material.
(e) On and after January 1, 2029, each educational entity (as defined in § 16-111-1) shall
ensure that the organic-waste materials that are generated by the educational entity are recycled at
an authorized composting facility or anaerobic digestion facility.
SECTION 4. Section 16-22-35 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-22 entitled "Curriculum
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — the Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby amended to read
as follows:
16-22-35. Littering prevention and recycling awareness program.
LC004754/SUB A - Page 5 of 7

The department of elementary and secondary education shall, in collaboration with the
Rhode Island resource recovery corporation, prescribe a presentation on litter prevention, reducing
and reusing materials, and recycling awareness that shall be used to educate every public school
student including, elementary, and middle school and high school students student within the state
on a yearly basis.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004754/SUB A
========
LC004754/SUB A - Page 6 of 7